test/src/gt-norm-yamls/U-all_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - käyđä - ei tsekättu: # Verb 'to visit' 
     käyđä+V+Inf: käyđä
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: käyn
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: käyt
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: käypi
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: käymä
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: käyttä
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: käyđhään
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kävin
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kävit
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kävi
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kävimä
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kävittä
     käyđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: käythiin
     käyđä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: käyny
     käyđä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: käyty
     käyđä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: käynheet
     käyđä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: käyvä
     käyđä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: käyvät
     käyđä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: käytävä
     käyđä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: käytävät
     
     käyđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kävisin
     käyđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kävisit
     käyđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kävis
     käyđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kävisimmä
     käyđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kävisittä
     käyđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: käytäis
     käyđä+V+Pass+Cond: käytäis 
     
     käyđä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: käy
     käyđä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: käykkää
     
     käyđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: käymässä
     käyđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: käymästä
     käyđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: käymhään
     käyđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: käymälä
     käyđä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: käymättä
# todo:
# Proofreäd the gold ständärd (below)
# Then: run änälyser, then correct. 


  Verb - keritä - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     keritä+V+Inf: keritä
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kerkkiin
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kerkkiit
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kerkkii
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kerkkiimä
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kerkkiittä
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kerithään
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kerkisin
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kerkisit
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kerkis
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kerkisimmä
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kerkisittä
     keritä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kerithiin
     keritä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: keriny
     keritä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: keritty
     keritä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kerinheet
     keritä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kerkkiivä
     keritä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kerkkiivät
     keritä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kerittävä
     keritä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kerittävät

     keritä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kerkkiisin
     keritä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kerkkiisit
     keritä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kerkkiis
     keritä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kerkkiisimmä
     keritä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kerkkiisittä
     keritä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kerittäis
     keritä+V+Pass+Cond: kerittäis
    
     keritä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kerkkii
     keritä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kerikkää
     
     keritä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kerkkiimässä
     keritä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kerkkiimästä
     keritä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kerkkiimhään
     keritä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kerkkiimällä
     keritä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kerkkiimättä

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kirjoittaat - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kirjoittaat+V+Inf: kirjoittaat
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kirjoitan
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kirjoitat
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kirjoittaa
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kirjoitamma
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kirjoitatta
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kirjoitethaan
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kirjoitin
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kirjoitit
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kirjoitti
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kirjoitimma
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kirjoititta
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kirjoitethiin
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kirjoittannu
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: kirjoitettu
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kirjoittanheet
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kirjoittaava
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kirjoittaavat
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kirjoitettava
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kirjoitettavat
     
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kirjoittaisin
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kirjoittaisit
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kirjoittais
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kirjoittaisima
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kirjoittaisitta
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kirjoitettais
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+Cond: kirjoitettais
  
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kirjoita
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kirjoittakkaa
     
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kirjoittamassa
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kirjoittamasta
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kirjoittamhaan
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kirjoittamala
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kirjoittamatta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Verb - kulkkeet ok: # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kulkkeet+V+Inf: kulkkeet
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuljen
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuljet
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kulkkee
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kuljema
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuljetta
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuljethaan
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuljin
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuljit
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kulki
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kuljima
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kuljitta
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuljethiin
     kulkkeet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kulkenu
     kulkkeet+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: kuljettu
     kulkkeet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kulkenheet
     kulkkeet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kulkkeeva
     kulkkeet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kulkkeevat
     kulkkeet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kuljettava
     kulkkeet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kuljettavat

     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kulkisin
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kulkisit
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kulkis
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kulkisimma
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kulkisitta
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kuljettais
     kulkkeet+V+Pass+Cond: kuljettais

     kulkkeet+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kulje
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kulkekkaa
     
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kulkemassa
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kulkemasta
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kulkemhaan
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kulkemalla
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kulkematta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
  Verb - kyetä - ei tsekattu : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     kyetä+V+Inf: kyetä
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kykenen
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kykenet
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kykenee
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kykenemmä
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kykenettä
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kyethään
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kykenin
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kykenit
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kykeni
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kykenimmä
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kykenittä
     kyetä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kyethiin
     kyetä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kyeny
     kyetä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: kyetty
     kyetä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kyenheet
     kyetä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kykeneevä
     kyetä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kykeneevät
     kyetä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kyettävä
     kyetä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kyettävät
     
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kykenisin
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kykenisit
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kykenis
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kykenisimä
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kykenisittä
     kyetä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kyettäis
     kyetä+V+Pass+Cond: kyettäis
    
     kyetä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kykene
     kyetä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kyekkää
     
     kyetä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kykenemässä
     kyetä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kykenemästä
     kyetä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kykenemhään
     kyetä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kykenemälä
     kyetä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kykenemättä

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kyytitä - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kyytitä+V+Inf: kyytitä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kyytitten
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kyytittet
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kyytittee
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kyytittemmä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kyytittettä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kyytithään
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kyytittin
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kyytittit
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kyytitti
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kyytittimmä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kyytittittä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kyytithiin
     kyytitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kyytiny
     kyytitä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: kyytitty
     kyytitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kyytinheet
     kyytitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kyytitteevä
     kyytitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kyytitteevät
     kyytitä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kyytittävä
     kyytitä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kyytittävät

     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kyytittisin
     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kyytittisit
     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kyytittis
     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kyytittisimä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kyytittisittä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kyytittäis
     kyytitä+V+Pass+Cond: kyytittäis

     kyytitä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kyytitte
     kyytitä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kyytikkää
     
     kyytitä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kyytittemässä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kyytittemästä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kyytittemhään
     kyytitä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kyytittemälä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kyytittemättä

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - lähteet - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     lähteet+V+Inf: lähteet
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lähđen
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lähđet
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lähtee
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lähđemä
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lähđettä
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lähđethään
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lähđin
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lähđit
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lähti
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lähđimä
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lähđittä
     lähteet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lähđethiin
     lähteet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lähteny
     lähteet+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: lähđetty
     lähteet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: lähtenheet
     lähteet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lähteevä
     lähteet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lähteevät
     lähteet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lähđettävä
     lähteet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lähđettävät

     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: lähtisin
     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: lähtisit
     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: lähtis
     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: lähtisimmä
     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: lähtisittä
     lähteet+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: lähđettäis
     lähteet+V+Pass+Cond: lähđettäis
